dict/kk_KZ.aff
FLAG num
SFX 16 N 45
SFX 16 0 бе/197 .
SFX 16 0 бек .
SFX 16 0 ге/200 .
SFX 16 0 гі/201 .
SFX 16 0 де/203 .
SFX 16 0 дегі .
SFX 16 0 дей .
SFX 16 0 ден .
SFX 16 0 ді .
SFX 16 0 дікі .
SFX 16 0 дің .
SFX 16 0 е/212 .
SFX 16 0 еді/213 .
SFX 16 0 етін .
SFX 16 0 кен .
SFX 16 0 л/218 .
SFX 16 0 лер/219 .
SFX 16 0 лері/220 .
SFX 16 0 леу/221 .
SFX 16 0 лі/222 .
SFX 16 0 лік/223 .
SFX 16 0 мен/226 .
SFX 16 0 міз/227 .
SFX 16 0 мін .
SFX 16 0 се/239 .
SFX 16 0 сі/241 .
SFX 16 0 сіз/242 .
SFX 16 0 сіздер .
SFX 16 0 сің .
SFX 16 0 сіңдер .
SFX 16 0 тін .
SFX 16 0 у .
SFX 16 0 ше .
SFX 16 0 ші/258 .
SFX 16 0 і/259 .
SFX 16 0 іл/260 .
SFX 16 0 ім/261 .
SFX 16 0 іміз/262 .
SFX 16 0 ін/263 .
SFX 16 0 іп/264 .
SFX 16 0 іпті/265 .
SFX 16 0 ірек .
SFX 16 0 іс/267 .
SFX 16 0 ің/268 .
SFX 16 0 іңіз/269 .

SFX 17 N 44
SFX 17 0 бе/197 .
SFX 17 0 бек .
SFX 17 0 бен/198 .
SFX 17 0 ге/200 .
SFX 17 0 ген .
SFX 17 0 гі/201 .
SFX 17 0 де/203 .
SFX 17 0 дегі/204 .
SFX 17 0 дей/205 .
SFX 17 0 ден .
SFX 17 0 дер/206 .
SFX 17 0 дері/207 .
SFX 17 0 деу/208 .
SFX 17 0 ді/209 .
SFX 17 0 дік/210 .
SFX 17 0 дікі .
SFX 17 0 дің .
SFX 17 0 е/212 .
SFX 17 0 еді .
SFX 17 0 етін .
SFX 17 0 мек .
SFX 17 0 мен .
SFX 17 0 міз .
SFX 17 0 мін .
SFX 17 0 пек .
SFX 17 0 сі/241 .
SFX 17 0 сіз/242 .
SFX 17 0 сіздер/243 .
SFX 17 0 тін .
SFX 17 0 тір/255 .
SFX 17 0 у .
SFX 17 0 ше/257 .
SFX 17 0 ші/258 .
SFX 17 0 і/259 .
SFX 17 0 іл/260 .
SFX 17 0 ім/261 .
SFX 17 0 іміз/262 .
SFX 17 0 ін/263 .
SFX 17 0 іп/264 .
SFX 17 0 іпті/265 .
SFX 17 0 ірек .
SFX 17 0 іс/267 .
SFX 17 0 ің/268 .
SFX 17 0 іңіз/269 .

SFX 18 N 41
SFX 18 0 бе/197 .
SFX 18 0 бек .
SFX 18 0 ге/200 .
SFX 18 0 ген .
SFX 18 0 гі/201 .
SFX 18 0 де/203 .
SFX 18 0 дегі/204 .
SFX 18 0 дей/205 .
SFX 18 0 дер/206 .
SFX 18 0 дері/207 .
SFX 18 0 деу/208 .
SFX 18 0 ді/209 .
SFX 18 0 дік/210 .
SFX 18 0 дікі .
SFX 18 0 дір/211 .
SFX 18 0 е/212 .
SFX 18 0 еді/213 .
SFX 18 0 мен .
SFX 18 0 мін .
SFX 18 0 нен .
SFX 18 0 нің .
SFX 18 0 се/239 .
SFX 18 0 сек .
SFX 18 0 сең .
SFX 18 0 сі/241 .
SFX 18 0 сіз/242 .
SFX 18 0 сіздер/243 .
SFX 18 0 сің .
SFX 18 0 у .
SFX 18 0 ше/257 .
SFX 18 0 ші/258 .
SFX 18 0 і/259 .
SFX 18 0 іл/260 .
SFX 18 0 ім/261 .
SFX 18 0 іміз/262 .
SFX 18 0 ін/263 .
SFX 18 0 іп .
SFX 18 0 ірек .
SFX 18 0 іс/267 .
SFX 18 0 ің/268 .
SFX 18 0 іңіз/269 .

SFX 19 N 61
SFX 19 0 бе/197 .
SFX 19 0 бек .
SFX 19 0 гі/201 .
SFX 19 0 е/212 .
SFX 19 0 еді/213 .
SFX 19 0 етін .
SFX 19 0 ке/216 .
SFX 19 0 кен .
SFX 19 0 пе/234 .
SFX 19 0 пек .
SFX 19 0 пен .
SFX 19 0 пін .
SFX 19 0 се/239 .
SFX 19 0 сі/241 .
SFX 19 0 сіз/242 .
SFX 19 0 сіздер .
SFX 19 0 сің .
SFX 19 0 те/246 .
SFX 19 0 тегі/247 .
SFX 19 0 тей/248 .
SFX 19 0 тен .
SFX 19 0 тер/249 .
SFX 19 0 тері/250 .
SFX 19 0 теу/251 .
SFX 19 0 ті/252 .
SFX 19 0 тік/253 .
SFX 19 0 тікі .
SFX 19 0 тін .
SFX 19 0 тір/255 .
SFX 19 0 тің .
SFX 19 0 у/256 .
SFX 19 0 ше/257 .
SFX 19 0 ші/258 .
SFX 19 0 і/259 [^кпқ]
SFX 19 0 іл/260 [^кпқ]
SFX 19 0 ім/261 [^кпқ]
SFX 19 0 іміз/262 [^кпқ]
SFX 19 0 ін/263 [^кпқ]
SFX 19 0 іп [^кпқ]
SFX 19 0 іпті .
SFX 19 0 ірек/266 [^кпқ]
SFX 19 0 іс/267 [^кпқ]
SFX 19 0 ің/268 [^кпқ]
SFX 19 0 іңіз/269 [^кпқ]
SFX 19 к гі/273 .
SFX 19 к гім/274 .
SFX 19 к гіміз/275 .
SFX 19 к гін/276 .
SFX 19 к гіп .
SFX 19 к гірек .
SFX 19 к гіс/277 .
SFX 19 к гің/278 .
SFX 19 к гіңіз/279 .
SFX 19 п бі/280 .
SFX 19 п біл/281 .
SFX 19 п бім/282 .
SFX 19 п біміз/283 .
SFX 19 п бін/284 .
SFX 19 п бірек .
SFX 19 п біс/285 .
SFX 19 п бің/286 .

SFX 20 N 56
SFX 20 0 дегі .
SFX 20 0 ды/294 .
SFX 20 0 дыр/295 .
SFX 20 0 дық .
SFX 20 0 дың .
SFX 20 0 й/296 .
SFX 20 0 йды/297 .
SFX 20 0 йтын .
SFX 20 0 л/298 .
SFX 20 0 лар/299 .
SFX 20 0 лау .
SFX 20 0 ма/300 .
SFX 20 0 май/301 .
SFX 20 0 майды .
SFX 20 0 мақ .
SFX 20 0 мен .
SFX 20 0 мын .
SFX 20 0 на/302 .
SFX 20 0 нан .
SFX 20 0 нда/303 .
SFX 20 0 ндағы .
SFX 20 0 ншы/304 .
SFX 20 0 ны/305 .
SFX 20 0 п/306 .
SFX 20 0 пты .
SFX 20 0 р/308 .
SFX 20 0 рақ .
SFX 20 0 с/309 .
SFX 20 0 са/310 .
SFX 20 0 сақ .
SFX 20 0 саң .
SFX 20 0 сы/311 .
SFX 20 0 сың .
SFX 20 0 т/313 .
SFX 20 0 та/314 .
SFX 20 0 тай/315 .
SFX 20 0 тар .
SFX 20 0 ты/317 .
SFX 20 0 тын/318 .
SFX 20 0 у/321 .
SFX 20 0 ушы/322 .
SFX 20 0 ша .
SFX 20 0 шы/324 .
SFX 20 0 ы/325 .
SFX 20 0 ыл/326 .
SFX 20 0 ын/328 .
SFX 20 0 ып .
SFX 20 0 ыс/330 .
SFX 20 0 і .
SFX 20 0 ға/333 .
SFX 20 0 ған/334 .
SFX 20 0 ғы/335 .
SFX 20 0 қ .
SFX 20 0 қа/337 .
SFX 20 0 ң/340 .
SFX 20 0 ңыз/341 .

SFX 21 N 44
SFX 21 0 а/287 .
SFX 21 0 ады .
SFX 21 0 атын .
SFX 21 0 дан .
SFX 21 0 дау/292 .
SFX 21 0 дағы .
SFX 21 0 ды/294 .
SFX 21 0 дыр/295 .
SFX 21 0 дық .
SFX 21 0 дың .
SFX 21 0 лар .
SFX 21 0 лау .
SFX 21 0 м .
SFX 21 0 ма/300 .
SFX 21 0 май/301 .
SFX 21 0 майды .
SFX 21 0 мақ .
SFX 21 0 мен .
SFX 21 0 мыз .
SFX 21 0 мын .
SFX 21 0 са/310 .
SFX 21 0 сақ .
SFX 21 0 саң .
SFX 21 0 сы/311 .
SFX 21 0 сың .
SFX 21 0 та/314 .
SFX 21 0 ты/317 .
SFX 21 0 тын .
SFX 21 0 у/321 .
SFX 21 0 ушы/322 .
SFX 21 0 шы/324 .
SFX 21 0 ы/325 .
SFX 21 0 ыл/326 .
SFX 21 0 ым/327 .
SFX 21 0 ын/328 .
SFX 21 0 ып/329 .
SFX 21 0 ыпты .
SFX 21 0 ыс/330 .
SFX 21 0 ың/331 .
SFX 21 0 ыңыз/332 .
SFX 21 0 ға/333 .
SFX 21 0 ған/334 .
SFX 21 0 ғы/335 .
SFX 21 0 ғыз/336 .

SFX 22 N 34
SFX 22 0 а/287 .
SFX 22 0 ады/288 .
SFX 22 0 атын .
SFX 22 0 байды .
SFX 22 0 да/290 .
SFX 22 0 ды/294 .
SFX 22 0 дыр/295 .
SFX 22 0 дық .
SFX 22 0 дың .
SFX 22 0 ма/300 .
SFX 22 0 май/301 .
SFX 22 0 майды .
SFX 22 0 мақ .
SFX 22 0 са .
SFX 22 0 сақ .
SFX 22 0 сы/311 .
SFX 22 0 та/314 .
SFX 22 0 тау .
SFX 22 0 у .
SFX 22 0 ушы/322 .
SFX 22 0 ша/323 .
SFX 22 0 шы/324 .
SFX 22 0 ы/325 .
SFX 22 0 ыл/326 .
SFX 22 0 ым/327 .
SFX 22 0 ын/328 .
SFX 22 0 ып .
SFX 22 0 ыпты .
SFX 22 0 ыс/330 .
SFX 22 0 ың/331 .
SFX 22 0 ыңыз .
SFX 22 0 ға/333 .
SFX 22 0 ған .
SFX 22 0 ғы/335 .

SFX 23 N 33
SFX 23 0 а/287 .
SFX 23 0 ады .
SFX 23 0 атын .
SFX 23 0 ба/289 .
SFX 23 0 байды .
SFX 23 0 бақ .
SFX 23 0 да .
SFX 23 0 дай/291 .
SFX 23 0 дағы/293 .
SFX 23 0 ды/294 .
SFX 23 0 дыр/295 .
SFX 23 0 дық .
SFX 23 0 дың .
SFX 23 0 нан .
SFX 23 0 са/310 .
SFX 23 0 саң .
SFX 23 0 сы/311 .
SFX 23 0 та .
SFX 23 0 у .
SFX 23 0 ушы/322 .
SFX 23 0 ша .
SFX 23 0 шы .
SFX 23 0 ы/325 .
SFX 23 0 ыл/326 .
SFX 23 0 ым/327 .
SFX 23 0 ып .
SFX 23 0 ыпты .
SFX 23 0 ыс/330 .
SFX 23 0 ың/331 .
SFX 23 0 ыңыз .
SFX 23 0 ға/333 .
SFX 23 0 ған .
SFX 23 0 ғы/335 .

SFX 24 N 45
SFX 24 0 а/287 .
SFX 24 0 ады .
SFX 24 0 атын .
SFX 24 0 па/307 .
SFX 24 0 пайды .
SFX 24 0 пақ .
SFX 24 0 пен .
SFX 24 0 са/310 .
SFX 24 0 саң .
SFX 24 0 сы/311 .
SFX 24 0 сыз/312 .
SFX 24 0 та/314 .
SFX 24 0 тай/315 .
SFX 24 0 тан .
SFX 24 0 тар/316 .
SFX 24 0 тау .
SFX 24 0 ты .
SFX 24 0 тыр/319 .
SFX 24 0 тық/320 .
SFX 24 0 тың .
SFX 24 0 у/321 .
SFX 24 0 ушы/322 .
SFX 24 0 шы/324 .
SFX 24 0 ы/325 [^кпқ]
SFX 24 0 ыл/326 [^кпқ]
SFX 24 0 ым/327 [^кпқ]
SFX 24 0 ын/328 [^кпқ]
SFX 24 0 ып/329 [^кпқ]
SFX 24 0 ыпты [^кпқ]
SFX 24 0 ыс/330 [^кпқ]
SFX 24 0 ың/331 [^кпқ]
SFX 24 0 ыңыз [^кпқ]
SFX 24 0 қа/337 .
SFX 24 0 қан/338 .
SFX 24 0 қыз/339 .
SFX 24 қ ғы/342 .
SFX 24 қ ғыл/343 .
SFX 24 қ ғым/344 .
SFX 24 қ ғын/345 .
SFX 24 қ ғып .
SFX 24 қ ғыпты .
SFX 24 қ ғырақ .
SFX 24 қ ғыс/346 .
SFX 24 қ ғың/347 .
SFX 24 қ ғыңыз .
