dict/kk_KZ.dic
адақтал/22
ажылдат/24
азымтал/12,22
азына/10,20
азықтан/23
айбындас/24
айнал/22
айту/11,21
айтқыз/22
айшықтас/24
айғақтал/22
айғыздан/23
айқайсы/20
актілен/18
ал/12,22
алакөл/17
алалат/24
алаңдат/24
алиев/19
алмастыр/21
алмағайыптан/23
алшақтат/24
альпинистей/16
алғыл/22
алқыныңқыра/20
антрацен/18
ап/14,24
апшырыл/22
арақтат/24
арбал/22
арбала/20
ардалан/23
ардансу/21
артистік/19
арқандал/22
астапыралла/20
атабез/17
аттаныс/14,24
ау/11,21
аузыүсіген/18
аумақтан/23
афлатоксиндер/16
ашқыз/22
аяқтама/10,20
ақайрандал/22
ақбозшөп/19
ақилан/23
ақит/24
ақыластыр/21
ақықта/20
аңдал/22
аңғырт/14,24
бадзрем/18
бадырай/21
байпақшаңдан/23
байызда/20
балықкөз/17
барашек/19
бартер/16
баста/10,20
бастығырыл/22
басқасын/23
батбұттау/21
баяулат/24
бейкүмән/18
бектеміс/19
бекіту/16
белиз/17
бенин/18
биеемшек/19
биязылан/23
бластоцель/17
блокбастер/16
божби/20
бойұр/21
болғыз/22
бомбылат/24
бораздала/20
бордақылан/23
боқтаңқыра/20
брисбен/18
будырат/24
буын/13,23
буындал/22
былпы/20
бытырат/24
бықына/20
бюджеттерд/19
білгір/16
бүгжию/16
бүйрекбез/17
бүкән/18
бүліншік/19
бұйдакендір/16
бұйығу/21
бұйығылан/23
бұлтақтағансы/20
бұлыңғырлат/24
бұрыл/12,22
бұрғылан/23
бұрқа/20
бұрқат/24
бөгеусіз/17
бөгрек/19
бөкесектену/16
вепстер/16
вуайеризм/18
вундеркинд/19
газдан/23
генез/17
геометриялау/21
гер/16
герметизацияла/20
гипноздал/22
гуілдек/19
гүлдір/16
гөйәң/18
далақтат/24
дардайсы/20
дағдар/21
даңылдат/24
даңғойлан/23
дейл/17
демеу/16
дербісек/19
диқангер/16
додала/20
долдан/23
домбықтал/22
дулығу/21
дэмиен/18
дімкес/19
діншіл/17
дүмпілдеу/16
дәйіс/19
дәлел/17
дәркер/16
дәрулфунун/18
егдет/19
егер/16
егіндікөл/17
елеусіздік/19
елнің/18
елпектеу/16
ералиев/19
еребейсіз/17
еркінсін/18
есектік/19
есир/16
есіксіз/17
ең/18,28
еңселес/19
жазымдан/23
жайдарысы/20
жайрат/24
жайқу/21
жамал/12,22
жана/10,20
жаныш/24
жапыр/21
жаралан/23
жарбаңда/20
жармақтал/22
жартастан/23
жарқылдат/24
жасақтал/22
жасақтандыр/21
жасаңдан/23
жасырғансы/20
жаудыр/11,21
жаудырыл/22
жаулан/23
жаусат/24
жаңашала/20
жаңғыр/21
жаһіл/17
жебей/16
жезінек/19
жертабандат/24
жетекшісіз/17
жетерлік/19
жетістігін/18
жеңгей/16
жиғыз/22
жобалан/23
жонғыла/20
жоғарлат/24
жыбырла/20
жый/21
жыламан/23
жылж/22
жылтырат/24
жылы/10,20
жым/13,23
жырла/20
жыртыңдас/24
жіктелгіш/19
жұлымдан/23
жұлғыз/22
жұлқыстыр/21
жұмбақсөз/17
жұмсарт/24
жұмыртқала/20
жұмыссыздықпен/18
жұптал/22
жәйлан/23
жәрдемдесу/16
зақорлану/21
зембіл/17
зияндал/22
зымияндан/23
зымға/20
зырылдат/24
зілділік/19
зәпрен/18
изеңдеу/16
иліккіз/17
исламдан/23
ишарала/20
иүгүрген/18
иөргемеш/19
картофель/17
карцер/16
квадраттал/22
келемеждел/17
келмейтін/18
кемерсу/16
кепезлліг/19
керсалу/21
кескіндел/17
кесірлен/18
кешіғу/16
кондратьев/19
консьерж/17
кілем/18
күдістену/16
күйттел/17
күлт/19
күргейлен/18
кәдешіл/17
кәләбір/16
көгентамырлан/23
көздес/19
көкейгөз/17
көксіген/18
көніктір/16
көтен/18
көңүл/17
лазарет/19
лықылда/20
майқандау/21
макроэлементтер/16
манихеизм/18
марғаулан/23
масақтал/22
маужырас/24
машықта/20
маңғаздан/23
маңқаю/21
мебельдел/17
мелиоративтік/19
метрдотель/17
миксер/16
мобилизацияла/20
мойрыл/22
мойрылт/24
мойындан/23
молескин/18
муниципализацияла/20
мызыл/22
мызғу/21
мықындан/23
міндетшіл/17
мүлгіс/19
мүңкір/16
мұқамбеткәрім/18
мәжгүл/17
нартәуекелшіл/17
нағып/24
нақтыла/20
немч/19
неохаседизм/18
нәжегей/16
нәржіл/17
обырлан/23
ойрандал/22
омсыраю/21
ортқу/21
отаула/20
отырғыз/22
оқыт/24
оңашалан/23
патрульдік/19
перделен/18
протез/17
пысқыр/21
пістедей/16
ресімдеген/18
родерик/19
рәсуала/20
саздан/23
салыстыр/21
санал/22
сарыгүл/17
саусау/21
сауық/14,24
саябырлан/23
сервер/16
серуен/18
сидерит/19
сипала/20
скальпель/17
сойыл/12,22
солбаңдау/21
сорлан/23
суыр/11,21
сыл/22
сылдырлат/24
сыптию/21
сықырла/20
сүйүнүклерінден/18
сүрлеу/16
сұмпайылан/23
сұну/21
сәл/17
сәндіп/19
табынт/24
тайқаңдау/21
талқылан/23
тамамдал/22
тарықтыр/21
тастал/22
тая/10,20
тағалат/24
таңертең/18
таңқал/22
тегеурінгүл/17
тепеңдеу/16
терек/19
теңсң/18
толымдау/21
тоғаштан/23
тоқсыр/21
трувер/16
турель/17
туғыз/22
тырақылану/21
тырмыс/24
тықылда/20
тілеулестік/19
тіптең/18
түймештел/17
түйір/16
түскеннен/18
түстенгіш/19
тұтқындал/22
тәлкуәйттау/21
тәпел/17
тәртіптену/16
төмен/18
төстес/19
фейруз/17
харекеттену/16
шабыттан/23
шайлық/24
шанжию/21
шағанақта/20
шағыл/12,22
шеген/18
шектес/19,29
шифөр/16
шошыт/24
шоқырайысу/21
шпиндель/17
шүбәлан/23
шүйгін/18
шұбал/12,22
шәңк/19
ызыңда/20
ызғыс/24
ытырыну/21
юрген/18
ігешділер/16
ғазірәһіл/17
ғанибет/19
қаз/12,22
қайнат/24
қайғылан/23
қалши/20
қампай/21
қандыірің/18
қатер/16
қатырлат/24
қаңтар/11,21
қаңылтырла/20
қинал/22
қолдан/13,23
қоныстал/22
қосамжарлас/24
қотар/21
қызкірпік/19
қызылшамен/18
қымтан/23
қыр/11,21
қырылдаңқыра/20
құнерез/17
құс/14,24
үйірсектеу/16
үскілен/18
үстемдік/19
ұзар/21
ұмтыл/22
ұқсат/24
әбдірәсіл/17
әйәй/16
әкімшісін/18
әмет/19
әртараптан/23
әскерилендіріл/17
әуку/16
әупішім/18
өпірем/18
өрек/19
